Utah statutes.
20A-3-602.   Hours for early voting.

(1)  The election officer shall determine the times for opening and closing the polls for each day of early voting provided that:

(a)  voting is open for a minimum of four hours during each day that polls are open during the early voting period; and

(b)  polls shall close at 5 p.m. on the last day of the early voting period.

(2)  Every registered voter who arrives at the polls before the time scheduled for closing of the polls shall be allowed to vote.

